Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-612
Accessories; penalties.

Any person who makes any use of or has in his or her possession or who aids or abets in the taking of any game or raw fur taken contrary to any of the provisions of the Game Law, with knowledge of such fact or of facts sufficient in law to charge him or her with such knowledge, shall be deemed a principal in the unlawful taking, transporting, or possession of such game or raw fur and shall be subject to the same penalties therefor as the person who took the game or raw fur, unlawfully had the game or raw fur in his or her possession, or unlawfully transported the game or raw fur.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 12, p. 436;

C.S.1929, § 37-612;

R.S.1943, § 37-612;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 15, p. 590;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-612;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 302.